Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7116
Peer support team.

A public safety agency may establish a peer support team. If a public safety agency does so, the agency shall develop written guidelines for the peer support team and its members.

Laws 2026, LB816, § 3.
July 18, 2026